Maryland, session 2025, SB0100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–428.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND NOTWITHSTANDING
THE TIME RESTRICTIONS UNDER § 10–410(A) AND (B) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON
WHO IS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO HUNT DEER AND WHO WOUNDS A
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0100*

SENATE BILL 100
DEER DURING LEGAL HUNTING HOURS MAY PURSUE AND KILL THE DEER AFTER
LEGAL HUNTING HOURS.
(B) (1) A SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A PERSON
WHO PURSUES A WOUNDED DEER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL USE ONLY THE MEANS AUTHORIZED FOR THE APPLICABLE HUNTING
SEASON OR PERMIT TO KILL THE DEER.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER §§ 10–410(E) AND
10–416(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON WHO PURSUES A WOUNDED DEER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY USE A LIGHT OR THROW
OR CAST THE RAYS OF A SPOTLIGHT, A HEADLIGHT, AN ARTIFICIAL LIGHT, A
BATTERY, OR ANY OTHER DEVICE WHILE PURSUING THE WOUNDED DEER.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.